Wyoming, session 2026, SF0060.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:


Section 1.

SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
(a) This section shall consist of funds appropriated
for K-12 school building and facility needs.

(b) As used in subsection (j) of this section, a
"priority" identified by an Arabic numeral means the
project ranking as submitted by the school facilities
commission within its budget recommendations provided under
W.S. 21-15-119.

(c) The amounts appropriated from the public school
foundation program account under paragraphs (j)(ii) through
(iv) of this section are for the period beginning July 1,
2026 and ending June 30, 2028, and any unexpended,
unobligated funds remaining from any of these
appropriations shall revert to the public school foundation
program account on June 30, 2028.

(d) Appropriations for projects denoted with an
asterisk (*) within subsection (j) of this section are
effective immediately, and end upon project completion,
unless otherwise provided by law. Except for amounts
denoted with an asterisk, the amounts appropriated from the
public school foundation program account under paragraphs
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
(j)(i) and (v) through (viii) of this section are for the
period beginning July 1, 2026, and ending upon project
completion, unless otherwise provided by law. Upon
completion of a project under this subsection, any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from the
appropriation for the project shall revert to the public
school foundation program account.

(e) As authorized under W.S. 21-15-119(a)(iii), the
school facilities commission may submit a supplemental
budget request for the period beginning July 1, 2027 and
ending June 30, 2028, for any emergency or unanticipated
need, or for any refinement or modification of a project
funded under this section, subject to any constraints or
other requirements imposed by the governor under W.S.
9-2-1013.

(f) An estimated schedule for deploying projects
funded by amounts appropriated under subsection (j) of this
section, as adopted by the school facilities commission and
as contained within the 2027-2028 biennial budget submitted
by the commission under W.S. 21-15-119, shall be used by
the state construction department to the extent practicable
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
to guide expenditure of appropriated funds. The estimated
schedule shall be based upon information, processes, events
and expenditures and shall not be binding upon the state
construction department or the school facilities
commission.

(g) Amounts appropriated under subsection (j) of this
section shall not be construed to be an entitlement or
guaranteed amount and shall be expended by the school
facilities commission to ensure adequate, efficient and
cost effective school buildings and facilities in
accordance with W.S. 21-15-114(a)(vii).

(h) In addition to accounting and reporting
requirements imposed under W.S. 28-11-301(c)(iv), the state
construction department shall report at least one (1) time
each year on the deployment of amounts to fund projects
under this section in accordance with the deployment
schedule, information on project progression and, if
applicable, the rationale for any deviation from the
estimated schedule. The reports, as approved by the
commission, shall be submitted by the department to the
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
select committee on school facilities, the joint
appropriations committee and the governor.

(j) For K-12 school facility projects, the following
amounts are appropriated from the public school foundation
program account to the school facilities commission for the
following purposes:

(i) Effective immediately, for component level
major maintenance projects, thirty-one million six hundred
sixty-one thousand three hundred twenty-two dollars
($31,661,322.00). The school facilities commission may
modify prioritization of projects contained in this
paragraph to optimize efficiency or based on project
readiness. Expenditure of funds appropriated by this
paragraph shall be subject to the following prescribed
maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

04-01 Big Horn #3 High School $828,878
04-02 Johnson #1 High School $3,137,677
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
04-03 Sheridan #2 Junior High School $2,593,497
04-04 Laramie #2 Administration Building $114,196
04-05 Fremont #14 Middle School $1,456,696
04-06 Hot Springs #1 Elementary School $948,168
04-07 Converse #2 Junior High/High School $1,756,228
04-08 Big Horn #1 Elementary School $173,963
04-09 Crook #1 K-12 School $610,461
04-10 Carbon #1 Middle School $1,880,657
04-11 Sublette #1 High School $1,878,241
04-12 Weston #7 High School $833,192
04-13 Washakie #1 Middle School $1,799,497
04-14 Lincoln #1 Elementary School $3,296,500
04-15 Weston #1 High School $4,703,382
04-16 Big Horn #2 High School $1,988,099
04-17 Carbon #2 Junior High/High School $808,866
04-18 Fremont #6 Middle School $244,378
04-19 Park #16 K-12 School $2,608,746
04-20 Big Horn #3 Elementary School $ 531,164
04-21 Johnson #1 K-12 School $ 1,428,703
04-22 Fremont #14 Middle School $ 1,287,903

(ii) For charter school leases, six million
three hundred thirty-two thousand nine hundred twenty-eight
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
dollars ($6,332,928.00). The funds appropriated under this
paragraph shall be distributed for charter school lease
expenses for school year 2026-2027 and school year
2027-2028, are subject to W.S. 21-3-110(a)(x) and the
following prescribed maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

05-01 Albany #1 Elementary School $347,799
05-02 Laramie #1 Elementary School $830,585
05-03 Laramie #1 Secondary School $916,645
05-04 Natrona #1 K-8 School $1,823,257
05-05 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,253,600
05-06 Lincoln #2 Elementary School $416,150
05-07 Platte #1 K-12 School $744,892
Total $ 6,332,928

(iii) Subject to the requirements of W.S.
21-3-110(a)(x), for future charter school leasing
obligations (priority 07-01), one million seven hundred
ninety-two thousand nine hundred seventy-six dollars
($1,792,976.00). The funds appropriated under this
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
paragraph shall only be expended for leasing expenses for
charter schools approved for operation pursuant to W.S.
21-3-301 et seq. In addition to any other reporting
requirements, not later than September 1, 2026 and
September 1, 2027, the state construction department shall
report any expenditure of the funds appropriated by this
paragraph to the select committee on school facilities, the
joint appropriations committee and the governor;

(iv) For modular buildings and leases, fifty-two
thousand one hundred twenty-five dollars ($52,125.00),
subject to the following prescribed maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

06-01 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
06-02 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
06-03 Laramie #1 Modular Lease $17,375
Total $52,125

(v) For design of school building and facility
projects, fifteen million seven hundred thirty-nine
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
thousand eight hundred fifty-five dollars ($15,739,855.00),
subject to the following prescribed maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

09-01 Teton #1 High School $2,809,810*
09-02 Crook #1 Secondary School $1,710,957
09-03 Laramie #1 High School $4,346,602
09-04 Laramie #1 Elementary School $3,675,736
09-05 Fremont #25 Elementary School $3,196,750
Total $15,739,855

(vi) For construction of school building and
facility projects, seventy-seven million three hundred
fifty-nine thousand seven hundred thirty-one dollars
($77,359,731.00), subject to the following prescribed
maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

10-01 Crook #1 Secondary School $12,632,827
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
10-02 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,494,000
10-03 Laramie #1 Elementary School $33,298,901
10-04 Fremont #25 Elementary School $29,934,003
Total $77,359,731

(vii) For demolition projects, two million six
hundred twenty thousand six hundred seventy dollars
($2,620,670.00), subject to the following prescribed
maximum amounts:

School Maximum
Priority District Project Amount

11-01 Laramie #1 Elementary School $1,286,510*
11-02 Albany #1 Elementary School $500,000
11-03 Laramie #1 Elementary School $834,160
Total $2,620,670

(viii) For unanticipated costs associated with
the projects funded under paragraphs (j)(i) and (v) through
(vii) of this section (priority 12-01), seven million six
hundred forty-two thousand eight hundred ninety-five
dollars ($7,642,895.00), subject to the following maximum
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
amounts:

(A) For design projects contained in
paragraph (j)(v) of this section, nine hundred forty-four
thousand three hundred ninety-one dollars ($944,391.00);

(B) For component level major maintenance
and construction projects contained in paragraphs (j)(i)
and (vi) of this section, six million five hundred forty-
one thousand two hundred sixty-four dollars
($6,541,264.00);

(C) For demolition projects contained in
paragraph (j)(vii) of this section, one hundred fifty-seven
thousand two hundred forty dollars ($157,240.00).

Section 2.

(a) For K-12 school facility safety and security
projects (priorities 08-01 and 08-02), ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) is appropriated to the school facilities
commission, from the public school foundation program
account, for design of security vestibules and vehicle
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
barricades and approved prioritized school district safety
and security remedies. The funds appropriated under this
subsection shall remain in effect beginning July, 1, 2026,
until the project is completed, unless otherwise provided
by law. Upon completion of a remedy under this section, any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation for the remedy shall revert to the public
school foundation program account.

(b) The school facilities commission shall establish
a prioritized list of K-12 school facility safety and
security remedies utilizing national and regional best
practices. The commission shall consider school safety and
security needs identified by school districts in
determining the prioritized list of remedies. Funds shall
be distributed to school districts upon application to the
state construction department, in the manner and form
required by the commission, and approved by the commission.

(c) Prior to the expenditure of funds appropriated by
subsection (a) of this section, for each safety and
security remedy, the commission shall include the remedy in
the school district facility plan required pursuant to W.S.
SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
21-15-116, ensure the remedy is a cost effective method to
address the safety and security need and specify a maximum
budget for each remedy.

(d) Not later than September 1, 2026, and each
September 1 thereafter until the funds appropriated under
subsection (a) of this section are expended or have
reverted upon completion of a remedy, in conjunction with
the school facilities commission's annual budget
recommendations required pursuant to W.S. 21-15-119, the
commission and state construction department shall report
to the select committee on school facilities, the joint
appropriations committee and the governor any expenditures
of funds appropriated under subsection (a) of this section
and shall include any request for funds necessary for the
construction of security vestibules and vehicle barriers
and to complete school district safety and security needs
identified pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

SF0060

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0086
Section 3. This act is immediately upon completion of
all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0060